test/src/morphology/A-pimmee_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - valkkee ei tsekattu: # Noun 'sak'
     pimmee+A+Sg+Nom: pimmee
     pimmee+A+Sg+Gen: pimmeen
     pimmee+A+Sg+Par: pimmeetä
     pimmee+A+Sg+Tra: pimmeeksi
     pimmee+A+Sg+Abe: pimmeettä
     pimmee+A+Sg+Ine: pimmeessä
     pimmee+A+Sg+Ela: pimmeestä
     pimmee+A+Sg+Ill: pimmeesseen
     pimmee+A+Sg+Ade: pimmeelä
     pimmee+A+Sg+Abl: pimmeeltä
     pimmee+A+Sg+All: pimmeele
     pimmee+A+Sg+Ess: pimmeenä
     pimmee+A+Pl+Nom: pimmeet
     pimmee+A+Pl+Gen: pimmeitten
     pimmee+A+Pl+Par: pimmeitä
     pimmee+A+Pl+Tra: pimmeiksi
     pimmee+A+Pl+Abe: pimmeittä
     pimmee+A+Pl+Ine: pimmeissä
     pimmee+A+Pl+Ela: pimmeistä
     pimmee+A+Pl+Ill: pimmeissiin
     pimmee+A+Pl+Ade: pimmeilä
     pimmee+A+Pl+Abl: pimmeiltä
     pimmee+A+Pl+All: pimmeile
     pimmee+A+Pl+Ess: pimmeinä
     pimmee+A+Pl+Com: pimmeine
